Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5438XS (5) 91 sb/js S.F. 2127 Section 1. Section 724.9, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 An applicant for an initial permit to carry weapons 3 or initial permit to acquire pistols or revolvers shall 4 demonstrate knowledge of firearm safety by any of the following 5 means: 6 Sec. 2. Section 724.9, subsections 3 and 6, Code 2026, are 7 amended to read as follows: 8 3. Firearm safety training shall not be required for 9 renewals of permits to carry weapons issued after December 10 31, 2010. Firearm safety training shall not be required for 11 renewals of permits to acquire pistols or revolvers initially 12 issued on and after July 1, 2026. 13 6. If an applicant for a permit to carry weapons applies 14 after expiration of the time periods specified for renewal in 15 section 724.11 , firearm safety training shall not be required 16 for a renewal permit under this section . An applicant for 17 a permit to acquire pistols or revolvers who applies after 18 expiration of the personâs prior permit to acquire pistols 19 or revolvers pursuant to section 724.20 is not required to 20 complete firearm safety training for a renewal permit under 21 this section unless the prior permit to acquire pistols or 22 revolvers was issued prior to July 1, 2026. 23 Sec. 3. Section 724.15, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 1. It is the intent of this section to satisfy federal 26 requirements of 18 U.S.C. Â§922(t)(3) in order to acquire 27 pistols or revolvers. In order to acquire a pistol or revolver 28 from a federally licensed firearms dealer, an unlicensed person 29 is required to have a valid permit to acquire or a valid permit 30 to carry weapons issued in accordance with this chapter or the 31 person must complete a satisfactory national instant criminal 32 background check pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Â§922(t) and provide 33 proof that the person has completed firearm safety training 34 in accordance with section 724.9 . A person under the age of 35 -1- LSB 5438XS (5) 91 sb/js 1/ 4 S.F. 2127 twenty-one shall not be issued a permit to acquire a pistol or 1 revolver, nor shall a nonprofessional permit to carry weapons 2 held by a person who has not reached the age of twenty-one be 3 valid for the transfer of a pistol or revolver from a federally 4 licensed firearms dealer. 5 Sec. 4. Section 724.16, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 6 amended to read as follows: 7 1. A person shall not transfer a firearm to another person 8 if the person knows or reasonably should know that the other 9 person is ineligible to possess dangerous weapons pursuant 10 to section 724.8B , has not completed firearm safety training 11 required under section 724.9, is intoxicated as provided under 12 the conditions set out in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or is 13 prohibited from receiving or possessing a firearm under section 14 724.26 or federal law. 15 2. A person shall not loan or rent a firearm to another 16 person for temporary use during lawful activities if the 17 person knows or reasonably should know that the other person 18 is ineligible to possess dangerous weapons pursuant to section 19 724.8B , has not completed firearm safety training required 20 under section 724.9, is intoxicated as provided under the 21 conditions set out in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or is 22 prohibited from receiving or possessing a firearm under section 23 724.26 or federal law. 24 Sec. 5. Section 724.17, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 1. The application for a permit to acquire pistols or 27 revolvers may be made to the sheriff of the county of the 28 applicantâs residence and shall be on a form prescribed 29 and published by the commissioner of public safety. The 30 application shall require only the full name of the applicant, 31 the driverâs license or nonoperatorâs identification card 32 number of the applicant, the residence of the applicant, the 33 date and place of birth of the applicant, and whether the 34 applicant meets the criteria specified in section sections 35 -2- LSB 5438XS (5) 91 sb/js 2/ 4 S.F. 2127 724.9 and 724.15 . The applicant shall also display an 1 identification card that bears a distinguishing number assigned 2 to the cardholder, the full name, date of birth, sex, residence 3 address, and brief description and color photograph of the 4 cardholder, or other identification as specified by rule of 5 the department of public safety. The sheriff shall conduct a 6 criminal history check concerning each applicant by obtaining 7 criminal history data from the department of public safety , 8 which shall include an inquiry of the national instant criminal 9 background check system maintained by the federal bureau of 10 investigation or any successor agency. A person who makes 11 what the person knows to be a false statement of material fact 12 on an application submitted under this section or who submits 13 what the person knows to be any materially falsified or forged 14 documentation in connection with such an application commits a 15 class âDâ felony. 16